Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-711
Bonds; state; not to impair obligations.

The State of Nebraska does hereby covenant and agree with the holders of bonds issued by a joint authority that the state will not limit or alter the rights hereby vested in a joint authority to acquire, maintain, construct, reconstruct, and operate projects, to establish and collect such rates, rentals, tolls, charges, license fees, and other fees as may be convenient or necessary to produce sufficient revenue to meet the expense of maintenance and operation of such projects and to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders of bonds of the joint authority. The state will also not in any way impair the rights and remedies of the bondholders until the bonds together with interest thereon and with interest on any unpaid installments of interest and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceedings by or on behalf of the bondholders are fully met and discharged. The provisions of sections 3-701 to 3-716 and of the proceedings authorizing bonds thereby shall constitute a contract with the holders of such bonds.

Laws 1969, c. 24, § 11, p. 215.